District of Columbia statutes.
42-3403.09

Expiration provisions.

This subchapter shall remain in effect until the Mayor declares that a housing crisis no longer exists pursuant to § 42-3405.12.

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 309, 27 DCR 2975
Nov. 5, 1983, D.C. Law 5-38, § 2(h), 30 DCR 4866
Sept. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-154, § 2(d), 35 DCR 5715
Sept. 6, 1995, D.C. Law 11-31, § 3(h), 42 DCR 3239
1981 Ed., § 45-1628.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980 Temporary Extension Amendment Act of 1988 (D.C. Law 7-140, September 21, 2008, law notification 35 DCR 7279).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980 Temporary Extension Amendment Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-13, September 11, 1993, law notification 40 DCR 6835).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(h) of Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980 Temporary Extension Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Law 10-176, September 22, 1994, law notification 41 DCR 6706).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(c) of the Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980 Extension Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-235, April 28, 1994, 41 DCR 2599).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(h) of the Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980 Reenactment and Amendment Emergency Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-285, July 8, 1994, 41 DCR 4904).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(h) of the Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980 Reenactment and Amendment Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-47, May 4, 1995, 42 DCR 2410) and § 3(h) of the Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980 Reenactment and Amendment Congressional Recess Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-96, July 19, 1995, 42 DCR 3837).

Reenactment of Law 3-86: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3401.01.

Amendment of section by Law 10-144: Section 2(h) of D.C. Law 10-144 purported to amend this section to read as follows: “This subchapter shall remain in effect until the Mayor declares that a housing crisis no longer exists pursuant to § 45-1662.” Expiration of subchapter: For provisions regarding the expiration of this subchapter, see § 42-3404.12.